Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-609.01
Right-of-way; hunting upon; unlawful; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for anyone to hunt upon the fenced right-of-way of any railroad in Nebraska without permission of the owner or responsible authority. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1959, c. 337, § 3, p. 1220;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 187;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 20.